test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VLONGVW_NoExtra_bingode_gt-norm.yaml
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obingodeensimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3bingode+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obingodeensimishini***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: obingodeenhimishinaanibanan
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: obingodeenhimishinaanibanag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: obingodeenhimishinaanibaning
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: obingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: obingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: obingodeenhimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: obingodeenhimishiwaaibanan
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: obingodeenhimishiwaaibanag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: obingodeenhimishiwaaibaning
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: obingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: obingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: obingodeenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: obingodeenhimishiniibanan
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: obingodeenhimishiniibanag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: obingodeenhimishiniibaning
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: obingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***an
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: obingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***ag
     +Px3bingode+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: obingodeenhimishini***idig, idog***ing
     
